Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-121
Simultaneous death with no sufficient evidence of survivorship.

Where the title to property or the devolution thereof depends upon priority of death and there is no sufficient evidence that the persons have died otherwise than simultaneously, the property of each person shall be disposed of as if he had survived, except as provided otherwise in sections 30-121 to 30-128.

Laws 1947, c. 112, § 1, p. 305.